Connecticut, session 2026, SB00486.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 5-207a of the general statutes is repealed and the
2 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
3 (a) For each position of employment with the state of Connecticut that
4 involves exposure to federal tax information, the [employing] agency
5 with custody of the federal tax information and [, in the case where the
6 Department of Administrative Services is the provider of human
7 resources services for such employing agency,] the Department of
8 Administrative Services, shall, subject to the provisions of section 31-51i,
9 require each applicant for, each employee applying for transfer to, and,
10 at least every five years, [or more often if required by the United States
11 Department of the Treasury,] each current employee of such a position,
SB486 / File No. 505 1

SB486 File No. 505
12 to (1) state in writing whether such applicant or employee has been
13 convicted of a crime or whether criminal charges are pending against
14 such applicant or employee at the time of application for employment
15 or transfer and, if so, to identify the charges and court in which such
16 charges are pending, and (2) be fingerprinted and submit to state and
17 national criminal history records checks. The criminal history records
18 checks required by this section shall be conducted in accordance with
19 section 29-17a. Each employee who has access to federal tax information
20 shall be subject to such criminal history records check at least every five
21 years.
22 (b) If a contractor or subcontractor has a contract with an agency to
23 perform work for the agency that entails such contractor or
24 subcontractor or any employee thereof to access federal tax information,
25 such contractor or subcontractor and any such employee shall be subject
26 to the requirements of subdivisions (1) and (2) of subsection (a) of this
27 section prior to commencing such work and [as often thereafter as
28 required by subsection (a) of this section] at least every five years
29 thereafter.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage 5-207a
GAE Joint Favorable
SB486 / File No. 505 2

SB486 File No. 505
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill, which makes various technical changes regarding criminal
background checks for employees with access to tax records, results in
no fiscal impact to the state.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
SB486 / File No. 505 3

SB486 File No. 505
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 486
AN ACT IMPLEMENTING THE RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE
DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES CONCERNING
CRIMINAL BACKGROUND CHECKS OF EMPLOYEES WITH
ACCESS TO TAX RECORDS.